North Carolina, session 2025, HB190.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-84.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-84.2. School calendar.
(a) School Calendar. – Each local board of education shall adopt a school calendar
consisting of 215 days all of which shall fall within the fiscal year. A school calendar shall include
the following:
…
(3a) A winter break starting on any day in the month of December and consisting
of 14 consecutive days with no instructional days or teacher workdays
scheduled. If a local board of education has had to close schools due to
inclement weather for three or more days before the winter break has started,
the local board may elect to make up the days the school was closed during
the winter break.
…
(d) Opening and Closing Dates. – Local boards of education shall determine the dates of
opening and closing the public schools under subdivision (a)(1) of this section. Except for
year-round schools, the opening date for students shall be no earlier than the Monday Wednesday
closest to August 26, 13, and the closing date for students shall be no later than the Friday closest
to June 11. 1. On a showing of good cause, the State Board of Education may waive the
requirement that the opening date for students be no earlier than the Monday closest to August
26 and may allow the local board of education to set an opening date no earlier than the Monday
closest to August 19, to the extent that school calendars are able to provide sufficient days to
accommodate anticipated makeup days due to school closings. A local board may revise the
scheduled closing date if necessary in order to comply with the minimum requirements for
instructional days or instructional time. For purposes of this subsection, the term "good cause"
means that schools in any local school administrative unit in a county have been closed eight
days per year during any four of the last 10 years because of severe weather conditions, energy
shortages, power failures, or other emergency situations.
The required opening and closing dates under this subsection shall not apply to any school
that a local board designated as having a modified calendar for the 2003-2004 school year or to
*H190-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
any school that was part of a planned program in the 2003-2004 school year for a system of
modified calendar schools, so long as the school operates under a modified calendar.
…."
SECTION 2. This act applies only to Lincoln County Schools and Iredell-Statesville
Schools.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 House Bill 190-First Edition